Indiana, session 2026, HB1397.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-28-6-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 69, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the aggregate
amount of applicable tax credits that the corporation may certify:
(1) for each state fiscal year ending on or before June 30, 2025,
for all taxpayers is two hundred fifty million dollars
($250,000,000); and
(2) for each state fiscal year ending on or after July 1, 2025, for all
taxpayers is three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000), fifty
million dollars ($50,000,000) of which must be allocated to
fund qualified community projects within local government
units under IC 6-3.1-34-24. Each certification under this
subdivision is subject to budget committee review.
(b) For purposes of determining the amount of applicable tax credits
that have been certified for a state fiscal year, the following apply:
(1) An applicable tax credit is considered awarded in the state
fiscal year in which the taxpayer can first claim the credit,
2026 IN 1397—LS 6495/DI 134


determined without regard to any carryforward period or
carryback period.
(2) An applicable tax credit awarded by the corporation before
July 1, 2022, shall be counted toward the aggregate credit
limitation under this section.
(3) If an accelerated credit is awarded under IC 6-3.1-26-15, the
amount counted toward the aggregate credit limitation under this
section for a state fiscal year shall be the amount of the credit for
the taxable year described in subdivision (1) prior to any discount.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the corporation determines
that:
(1) an applicable tax credit should be certified in a state fiscal
year; and
(2) certification of the applicable tax credit will result in an
aggregate amount of applicable tax credits certified for that state
fiscal year that exceeds the maximum amount provided in
subsection (a);
the corporation may, after review by the budget committee, certify the
applicable tax credit to the taxpayer.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2032.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.1-34-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) As used in this section, "downtown area"
means:
(1) the central business district of a city or town; or
(2) any commercial or mixed use area within a neighborhood
of a city or town that has traditionally served, since the
founding of the community, as the retail service and
communal focal point within the community.
(b) As used in this section, "initiative" means the small town
opportunity initiative established by subsection (f).
(c) As used in this section, "nonprofit taxpayer" means a
taxpayer:
(1) that is tax exempt under Section 501 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(2) for which some or all of its mission is to revitalize the
community it serves; and
(3) whose leadership includes primarily members of the
community it serves.
(d) As used in this section, "qualified community project"
means a project that:
(1) is located in the:
2026 IN 1397—LS 6495/DI 134


(A) downtown area of a city or a town with a population of
less than thirty thousand (30,000);
(B) downtown area of a city or a town that is located in a
county with a population of less than seventy-five thousand
(75,000); or
(C) unincorporated territory of a county with a population
of less than seventy-five thousand (75,000) if the site of the
project is an area of the unincorporated territory that
serves as the retail service and communal focal point
within the unincorporated territory;
(2) involves the:
(A) historic preservation;
(B) redevelopment; or
(C) rehabilitation;
of real property; and
(3) has a total project budget of at least fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000).
(e) As used in this section, "qualified investment" means the
amount of the taxpayer's expenditures that are:
(1) for the redevelopment or rehabilitation of real property as
part of a qualified community project; and
(2) approved by the corporation before the expenditure is
made.
(f) The small town opportunity initiative is established.
(g) The corporation shall administer the initiative.
(h) The purpose of the initiative is to undertake qualified
community projects within local government units to do the
following:
(1) Advance historic preservation.
(2) Redevelop or rehabilitate distressed buildings or
underutilized property.
(3) Redevelop or rehabilitate sites where distressed buildings
once stood.
(i) A for-profit taxpayer undertaking a qualified community
project under the initiative is entitled to a redevelopment tax credit
under this chapter equal to twenty percent (20%) of the taxpayer's
cost of the project.
(j) A nonprofit taxpayer undertaking a qualified community
project under the initiative is entitled to a redevelopment tax credit
under this chapter equal to thirty percent (30%) of the taxpayer's
cost of the project.
(k) Qualified community projects undertaken under this section
2026 IN 1397—LS 6495/DI 134


are not subject to any statutory or administrative repayment
obligation.
(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for a
nonprofit taxpayer undertaking a qualified community project
under this section, expenditures incurred to acquire, hold, or
prepare real property for redevelopment or rehabilitation before
the date the taxpayer's initial application or application for
certification is approved by the corporation shall be included in the
taxpayer's qualified investment if:
(1) the expenditures were incurred for the primary purpose
of future redevelopment consistent with subsection (h);
(2) the nonprofit taxpayer obtained site control in furtherance
of a locally supported redevelopment effort; and
(3) the corporation determines, as part of the application or
certification process, that inclusion of such expenditures is in
the public interest and supportive of early stage community
redevelopment efforts.
(m) For purposes of determining whether an expenditure is
included as part of a qualified investment under subsection (l), an
expenditure shall be treated as if it were approved by the
corporation as of the date the expenditure was originally incurred.
2026 IN 1397—LS 6495/DI 134